Colorado, session 2026A, SB082.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 29-20-406 as
follows:
29-20-406. Renewable energy project fees - local authority -
fast-track program - refund - reporting - legislative declaration -
definitions.
(1) (a) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY HEREBY FINDS AND DECLARES
THAT:
(I) COLORADO HAS LONG RECOGNIZED THAT LAND USE IS A LOCAL
FUNCTION, AND COUNTIES ARE BEST POSITIONED TO BALANCE ENERGY
DEVELOPMENT WITH COMMUNITY IMPACTS; AND
(II) FACILITIES CAN CREATE SIGNIFICANT LOCAL IMPACTS ON
-2- SB26-082

ROADS, EMERGENCY SERVICES, AND THE ENVIRONMENT THAT ARE MOST
DIRECTLY BORNE BY LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND RESIDENTS.
(b) THEREFORE, IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO:
(I) REAFFIRM THAT LOCAL GOVERNMENTS RETAIN AUTHORITY TO
APPROVE, CONDITION, OR DENY PROJECTS THROUGH LOCAL LAND USE
PROCESSES;
(II) CREATE A VOLUNTARY STRUCTURE THAT INCENTIVIZES
FASTER, PREDICTABLE LOCAL PERMITTING BY ALLOWING LOCAL
GOVERNMENTS TO RETAIN HIGHER FACILITY OWNER-PAID FEES WHEN
STATUTORY TIMELINES ARE MET; AND
(III) ENSURE PROJECTS CONTRIBUTE FAIRLY AND PREDICTABLY TO
LOCAL FISCAL IMPACTS THROUGH A SUCCESS FEE CHARGED ON FINAL
APPROVAL OF THE PROJECT.
(2) (a) THE POWER AND AUTHORITY GRANTED BY THIS SECTION
DOES NOT LIMIT ANY POWER OR AUTHORITY PRESENTLY EXERCISED BY A
LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR PREVIOUSLY GRANTED TO A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT. EACH LOCAL GOVERNMENT WITHIN ITS RESPECTIVE
JURISDICTION HAS THE AUTHORITY TO:
(I) DEVELOP A UNIFORM ELECTRONIC APPLICATION AND
PERMITTING SYSTEM FOR FACILITY OWNERS APPLYING FOR LAND USE
APPROVAL TO DEVELOP A RENEWABLE ENERGY PROJECT;
(II) CREATE A STANDARD PERMIT APPLICATION PROCESS, AS WELL
AS ESTABLISH AND COLLECT A STANDARD FEE FROM FACILITY OWNERS;
(III) CREATE AN EXPEDITED PERMIT APPLICATION PROCESS, AS
WELL AS ESTABLISH AND COLLECT AN EXPEDITED FEE FROM FACILITY
OWNERS; AND
(IV) ESTABLISH AND COLLECT A SUCCESS FEE FROM FACILITY
-3- SB26-082

OWNERS AFTER A LOCAL GOVERNMENT APPROVES A RENEWABLE ENERGY
PROJECT.
(b) A PERMITTING AND APPLICATION SYSTEM DEVELOPED BY A
LOCAL GOVERNMENT PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2) MUST COMPLY
WITH SUBSECTIONS (3) THROUGH (7) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) A FACILITY OWNER THAT INTENDS TO DEVELOP A RENEWABLE
ENERGY PROJECT MAY SUBMIT EITHER A STANDARD PERMIT APPLICATION
OR, IF ESTABLISHED BY THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT, AN EXPEDITED PERMIT
APPLICATION TO THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
PROCEDURES DEVELOPED BY THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION.
(4) (a) FOR EXPEDITED PERMIT APPLICATIONS RECEIVED BY THE
LOCAL GOVERNMENT ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, EXCEPT AS
OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SUBSECTION (4), THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT
SHALL ISSUE A DETERMINATION OF WHETHER THE APPLICATION IS
COMPLETE WITHIN TWENTY DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE APPLICATION. THE
LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHALL NOTIFY THE FACILITY OWNER IN WRITING
WHETHER THE APPLICATION IS COMPLETE.
(b) A DETERMINATION THAT AN APPLICATION IS NOT COMPLETE
MUST INCLUDE A CONSOLIDATED DEFICIENCY NOTICE WITH A LIST OF ALL
MISSING OR INCOMPLETE ITEMS THAT THE FACILITY OWNER MUST CORRECT
FOR THE APPLICATION TO BE DEEMED COMPLETE.
(c) (I) AN APPLICATION SUBMITTED TO A LOCAL GOVERNMENT
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION IS DEEMED APPROVED BY
THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT IF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT HAS NOT, WITHIN
TWENTY DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE APPLICATION, NOTIFIED THE
FACILITY OWNER PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)(a) OF THIS SECTION
-4- SB26-082

WHETHER THE APPLICATION IS COMPLETE.
(II) IF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT DETERMINES AN APPLICATION IS
NOT COMPLETE, THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY HAVE AN ADDITIONAL
THIRTY DAYS AFTER PROVIDING INITIAL NOTICE THAT THE APPLICATION IS
INCOMPLETE TO PROVIDE THE CONSOLIDATED DEFICIENCY NOTICE.
(5) IF AN APPLICATION IS DEEMED INCOMPLETE, THE FACILITY
OWNER HAS THIRTY DAYS FROM THE DATE THAT THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT
PROVIDED THE CONSOLIDATED DEFICIENCY NOTICE TO CURE ANY
DEFICIENCIES IDENTIFIED IN THE CONSOLIDATED DEFICIENCY NOTICE OR
TO APPEAL THE DETERMINATION.
(6) (a) THE EXPEDITED PERMIT FEE CONSISTS OF THE STANDARD
FEE, AS WELL AS AN ADDITIONAL CHARGE THAT THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT
SHALL REFUND TO THE FACILITY OWNER AS FOLLOWS:
(I) IF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ISSUES A FINAL DECISION WITHIN
ONE HUNDRED TWENTY DAYS OR FEWER AFTER RECEIPT OF THE
APPLICATION, ZERO PERCENT OF THE ADDITIONAL CHARGE IS REFUNDED TO
THE FACILITY OWNER;
(II) IF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ISSUES A FINAL DECISION
BETWEEN ONE HUNDRED TWENTY-ONE DAYS AND ONE HUNDRED EIGHTY
DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE APPLICATION, FIFTY PERCENT OF THE
ADDITIONAL CHARGE IS REFUNDED TO THE FACILITY OWNER;
(III) IF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ISSUES A FINAL DECISION
BETWEEN ONE HUNDRED EIGHTY-ONE DAYS AND TWO HUNDRED FORTY
DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE APPLICATION, SEVENTY-FIVE PERCENT OF THE
ADDITIONAL CHARGE IS REFUNDED TO THE FACILITY OWNER; OR
(IV) IF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ISSUES A FINAL DECISION MORE
THAN TWO HUNDRED FORTY DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE APPLICATION,
-5- SB26-082

ONE HUNDRED PERCENT OF THE ADDITIONAL CHARGE IS REFUNDED TO THE
FACILITY OWNER.
(b) IN DETERMINING THE AMOUNT OF THE ADDITIONAL CHARGE
FOR AN EXPEDITED APPLICATION THAT A LOCAL GOVERNMENT MUST
REFUND PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (6)(a) OF THIS SECTION, THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT SHALL NOT INCLUDE ANY PORTION OF THE THIRTY-DAY
CURE PERIOD IN THE CALCULATION OF THE TIME IT TAKES FOR THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT TO ISSUE A FINAL DECISION.
(7) (a) IF A FACILITY OWNER HAS SUBMITTED AN EXPEDITED
PERMIT APPLICATION, THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHALL SELECT AND HIRE
A QUALIFIED AND INDEPENDENT NONGOVERNMENTAL CONTRACTOR
UNDER THE DIRECTION OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT TO PROVIDE THE
LOCAL GOVERNMENT WITH TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE IN REVIEWING THE
APPLICATION.
(b) AN INDEPENDENT NONGOVERNMENTAL CONTRACTOR THAT
PROVIDES TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (7)
MAY ASSIST THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT WITH SOME OR ALL OF THE
FOLLOWING, AT THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT'S DISCRETION:
(I) REVIEWING THE FACILITY OWNER'S APPLICATION AND
PROPOSAL;
(II) PREPARING THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT'S COMPLETENESS
DETERMINATION;
(III) PREPARING THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT'S CONSOLIDATED
DEFICIENCY NOTICE;
(IV) PROVIDING RESPONSES TO A FACILITY OWNER'S APPEAL OF
ANY ITEM IN A CONSOLIDATED DEFICIENCY NOTICE; AND
(V) PREPARING A FINAL DECISION ON THE FACILITY OWNER'S
-6- SB26-082

APPLICATION.
(c) THE FACILITY OWNER SHALL BEAR THE INDEPENDENT
NONGOVERNMENTAL CONTRACTOR'S COSTS FOR ANY TECHNICAL
ASSISTANCE PROVIDED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION AND SHALL REMIT
PAYMENT FOR THE COSTS TO THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT, WHICH SHALL PAY
THE CONTRACTOR. THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY CHARGE THE FACILITY
OWNER AN ADDITIONAL FEE IN AN AMOUNT NOT TO EXCEED TEN PERCENT
OF THE COST OF THE CONTRACT WITH THE CONTRACTOR FOR CONTRACT
ADMINISTRATION, TECHNICAL REVIEW, AND ADDITIONAL PERMIT
PROCESSING.
(d) (I) THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT, IN ITS SOLE DISCRETION, SHALL
PROVIDE OVERSIGHT TO ENSURE THAT INDEPENDENT NONGOVERNMENTAL
CONTRACTORS PROVIDE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THE TERMS OF THEIR CONTRACTS. THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY REQUIRE
A CONTRACTOR'S TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO CONFORM TO ALL LAWS AND
ORDINANCES APPLICABLE TO THE APPLICATION IN QUESTION.
(II) THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY DEEM SOME OR ALL OF THE
CONTRACTOR'S TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE AS UNACCEPTABLE AND MAY
REJECT, REQUIRE CORRECTION OF, OR DENY APPROVAL FOR SUCH
ASSISTANCE.
(8) (a) ANY FACILITY OWNER WHOSE RENEWABLE ENERGY PROJECT
IS APPROVED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION SHALL PAY A SUCCESS FEE IN AN
AMOUNT SET BY THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT UPON FINAL APPROVAL OF THE
PROJECT.
(b) A FACILITY OWNER WHOSE RENEWABLE ENERGY PROJECT IS
APPROVED PURSUANT TO A LOCAL GOVERNMENT'S EXPEDITED PERMIT
APPLICATION SHALL PAY AN ADDITIONAL SUCCESS FEE, IN AN AMOUNT SET
-7- SB26-082

BY THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT, BASED ON THE AMOUNT OF TIME BETWEEN
THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT'S RECEIPT OF THE APPLICATION AND ITS
ISSUANCE OF FINAL APPROVAL OF THE PROJECT. THE PERCENTAGE OF THE
ADDITIONAL SUCCESS FEE TO BE PAID BY THE FACILITY OWNER IS
DETERMINED AS FOLLOWS:
(I) IF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ISSUES FINAL APPROVAL WITHIN
ONE HUNDRED TWENTY DAYS OR FEWER AFTER RECEIPT OF THE
APPLICATION, ONE HUNDRED PERCENT OF THE ADDITIONAL SUCCESS FEE;
(II) IF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ISSUES FINAL APPROVAL BETWEEN
ONE HUNDRED TWENTY-ONE DAYS AND ONE HUNDRED EIGHTY DAYS AFTER
RECEIPT OF THE APPLICATION, FIFTY PERCENT OF THE ADDITIONAL SUCCESS
FEE;
(III) IF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ISSUES FINAL APPROVAL BETWEEN
ONE HUNDRED EIGHTY-ONE DAYS AND TWO HUNDRED FORTY DAYS AFTER
RECEIPT OF THE APPLICATION, TWENTY-FIVE PERCENT OF THE ADDITIONAL
SUCCESS FEE; OR
(IV) IF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ISSUES A FINAL DECISION MORE
THAN TWO HUNDRED FORTY DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE APPLICATION,
THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHALL ONLY CHARGE THE SUCCESS FEE FOR A
STANDARD PERMIT APPLICATION APPROVAL PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(8)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) A LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHALL USE THE MONEY COLLECTED
FROM THE SUCCESS FEE ONLY FOR FUNDING:
(I) LOCAL GOVERNMENT STAFF RESPONSIBLE FOR PERMITTING AND
ENFORCEMENT OF LOCAL RENEWABLE ENERGY LAWS AND ORDINANCES;
(II) INSPECTION AND COMPLIANCE MONITORING IN CONNECTION
WITH RENEWABLE ENERGY PROJECTS;
-8- SB26-082

(III) MITIGATION AND REPAIR TO LOCAL ROADS IMPACTED BY
HAULING OF HEAVY MACHINERY FOR RENEWABLE ENERGY PROJECTS;
(IV) EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AND FIRE READINESS RELATED TO
THE RENEWABLE ENERGY FACILITY; AND
(V) OVERSIGHT OF ANY DECOMMISSIONING OF A RENEWABLE
ENERGY FACILITY.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-9- SB26-082